Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 7 Personal Property

Cross references. —

As to perfecting security interests in general, see § 34.1-9-308 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Bailee's lien for work on goods as extending to other goods of the bailor in his possession, 25 ALR2d 1037.

Priority as between lien for repairs and the like, and right of seller under conditional sales contract, 36 ALR2d 198.

Priority as between artisan's lien and chattel mortgage, 36 ALR2d 229.

Garageman's lien: modern view as to validity of statute permitting sale of vehicle without hearing, 64 ALR3d 814.

Right of mortgagee and/or lienor to compensation when property subject to mortgage and/or lien is taken by federal governmental forfeiture based on criminal acts of owner, 136 ALR Fed 593.